epay/epayservices/src/main/resources/com/otextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/nl.xml
		4zg
		2z3h
		z2i
		ziek3l
		zie4k3o
		ziek3w
		ziel4s
		zie5sl
		3zif
		zi2g5a
		zij5kl
		zij3po
		zij5s4
		zik2w
		zi4n3a4
		zings3
		zin4k3l
		zin4s
		zins3t
		zins5ta
		zin5str
		zi3o5
		zipi3
		zi4t
		zit3e
		zit3j
		zit3u4
		4z3k
		4z3l
		4zm
		zodi5
		zoet3j
		zoet5ste
		zo3f2
		zoi4
		zo5ie
		zo3la
		zome4
		zo2na
		zon3sf
		zon5ta
		zooi5tj
		zo1p
		zor4g3a
		zor4gl
		zor4gr
		zo2t
		zot3h
		zo3tr
		zo3v
		4z3p
		4z3r
		2zs
		4z5t
		zui4d3i
		zui4dr
		zus3
		2zv
		z4w
		zwets5te.
		5zy
		2z3z
		zz3in
		zz3or
		z4z5w
	</patterns>
</hyphenation-info>
